Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. General Provisions.
Sec. 45.29.109.
Scope.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) and (d) of this section, this chapter applies to

a transaction, regardless of its form, that creates a security interest in personal property or fixtures by contract;

an agricultural lien;

a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes;

a consignment;

a security interest arising under AS

45.02.401

,

45.02.505

,

45.02.711(c)

, or AS

45.12.508(e)

, as provided in AS

45.29.110

; and

a security interest arising under AS

45.04.210

or AS

45.05.118

.

The application of this chapter to a security interest in a secured obligation is not affected by the fact that the obligation is itself secured by a transaction or interest to which this chapter does not apply.

This chapter does not apply to the extent that

a statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States preempts this chapter;

another statute of this state expressly governs the creation, perfection, priority, or enforcement of a security interest created by this state or a governmental unit of this state;

a statute of another state, a foreign country, or a governmental unit of another state or a foreign country, other than a statute generally applicable to security interests, expressly governs creation, perfection, priority, or enforcement of a security interest created by the state, country, or governmental unit; or

the rights of a transferee beneficiary or nominated person under a letter of credit are independent and superior under AS

45.05.114

.

This chapter does not apply to

a landlord’s lien, other than an agricultural lien;

a lien, other than an agricultural lien, given by statute or other rule of law for services or materials, but AS

45.29.333

applies with respect to priority of the lien;

an assignment of a claim for wages, salary, or other compensation of an employee;

a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes as part of a sale of the business out of which they arose;

an assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes that is for the purpose of collection only;

an assignment of a right to payment under a contract to an assignee that is also obligated to perform under the contract;

an assignment of a single account, payment intangible, or promissory note to an assignee in full or partial satisfaction of a preexisting indebtedness;

a transfer of an interest in or an assignment of a claim under a policy of insurance, other than an assignment by or to a health care provider of a health care insurance receivable and any subsequent assignment of the right to payment, but AS

45.29.315

and

45.29.322

apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

an assignment of a right represented by a judgment, other than a judgment taken on a right to payment that was collateral;

a right of recoupment or setoff, but

AS

45.29.340

applies with respect to the effectiveness of rights of recoupment or setoff against deposit accounts; and

AS

45.29.404

applies with respect to defenses or claims of an account debtor;

the creation or transfer of an interest in or lien on real property, including a lease or rents thereunder, except to the extent that provision is made for

liens on real property in AS

45.29.203

and

45.29.308

;

fixtures in AS

45.29.334

;

fixture filings in AS

45.29.501

,

45.29.502

,

45.29.512

,

45.29.516

, and

45.29.519

; and

security agreements covering personal and real property in AS

45.29.604

;

an assignment of a claim arising in tort, other than a commercial tort claim, but AS

45.29.315

and

45.29.322

apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

an assignment of a deposit account in a consumer transaction, but AS 45.29.315 and 45.29.322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds; or

notwithstanding (c)(2) of this section, a transfer by a government or governmental subdivision or agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.110.
Security interests arising under AS 45.02 or AS 45.12.

A security interest arising under AS

45.02.401

,

45.02.505

,

45.02.711(c)

, or AS

45.12.508(e)

is subject to this chapter. However, until the debtor obtains possession of the goods,

the security interest is enforceable even if AS

45.29.203(b)(3)

has not been satisfied;

filing is not required to perfect the security interest;

the rights of the secured party after default by the debtor are governed by AS 45.02 or AS 45.12; and

the security interest has priority over a conflicting security interest created by the debtor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)